Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.475

Employees with unsupervised access to children—Rules for background investigation.

The director shall adopt rules, in cooperation with the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, for the background investigation of current employees and of persons being actively considered for positions with the department who will or may have unsupervised access to children. The director shall also adopt rules, in cooperation with the secretary of the department of children, youth, and families, for background investigation of positions otherwise required by federal law to meet employment standards. "Considered for positions" includes decisions about (1) initial hiring, layoffs, reallocations, transfers, promotions, or demotions, or (2) other decisions that result in an individual being in a position that will or may have unsupervised access to children as an employee, an intern, or a volunteer.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 807; 2007 c 387 s 8; 2002 c 354 s 222; 1993 c 281 s 38; 1986 c 269 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Short title—Headings, captions not law—Severability—Effective dates—2002 c 354: See RCW 41.80.907 through 41.80.910.

Effective date—1993 c 281: See note following RCW 41.06.022.

Children and vulnerable adults: RCW 43.43.830 through 43.43.842.

State hospitals: RCW 72.23.035.

Supervision, care, or treatment of children or individuals with developmental disabilities or other vulnerable persons—State employment—Investigation of conviction records or pending charges: RCW 43.20A.710.